New York, session 2025-2026, S4994.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 70 of the domestic relations law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (c) to read as follows: 3 (c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there is 4 hereby established a moratorium on the use of forensic child custody 5 evaluators in family court proceedings. No court shall order or allow 6 into evidence a forensic custody report in the context of a custody or 7 visitation proceeding. 8 (2) For the purposes of this subdivision: 9 (i) "forensic custody report" shall mean any report, assessment or 10 evaluation prepared by a forensic child custody evaluator and used by 11 the court in a child custody or visitation determination; and 12 (ii) "forensic child custody evaluator" shall mean a licensed psychia- 13 trist, psychologist or social worker authorized by statute or the court 14 to perform a forensic evaluation relating to a party or a child in order 15 to assist the court in a child custody or visitation determination. 16 (3) Forensic child custody evaluators shall not be reinstated until 17 all eleven recommendations of the Blue-Ribbon commission on forensic 18 custody evaluations have been implemented. 19 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 240 of the domestic relations law is 20 amended by adding a new paragraph (a-4) to read as follows: 21 (a-4) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there 22 is hereby established a moratorium on the use of forensic child custody 23 evaluators in family court proceedings. No court shall order or allow EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09750-01-5 S. 4994 2 1 into evidence a forensic custody report in the context of a custody or 2 visitation proceeding. 3 (2) For the purposes of this subdivision: 4 (i) "forensic custody report" shall mean any report, assessment or 5 evaluation prepared by a forensic child custody evaluator and used by 6 the court in a child custody or visitation determination; and 7 (ii) "forensic evaluator" shall mean a licensed psychiatrist, psychol- 8 ogist or social worker authorized by statute or the court to perform a 9 forensic evaluation relating to a party or a child in order to assist 10 the court in a child custody or visitation determination. 11 (3) Forensic child custody evaluators shall not be reinstated until 12 all eleven recommendations of the Blue-Ribbon commission on forensic 13 custody evaluations have been implemented. 14 § 3. Section 651 of the family court act is amended by adding a new 15 subdivision (g) to read as follows: 16 (g) 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, there is 17 hereby established a moratorium on the use of forensic child custody 18 evaluators in family court proceedings. No court shall order or allow 19 into evidence a forensic custody report in the context of a custody or 20 visitation proceeding. 21 2. For the purposes of this subdivision: 22 (i) "forensic custody report" shall mean any report or evaluation 23 prepared by a forensic child custody evaluator which includes such eval- 24 uator's recommendations, opinions or conclusions as to child custody or 25 visitation; and 26 (ii) "forensic child custody evaluator" shall mean a licensed psychia- 27 trist, psychologist or social worker authorized by statute or the court 28 to perform a forensic evaluation relating to a party or a child in order 29 to assist the court in a child custody or visitation determination. 30 3. Forensic child custody evaluators shall not be reinstated until all 31 eleven recommendations of the Blue-Ribbon commission on forensic custody 32 evaluations have been implemented. 33 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.